tex/ukrhyph/ukrhypst.pat.txt
1о2бід
обіл2
1обкл
о1блис
об3ль
1обсл
1обт
1обх
1о2б'1
о1в
о3ва
ов2ві
овг3н
о2вд
ов2до
ов2зд
ови2з3н
овис3л
овис1т
о3в2ло
о2вп
овп3л
ов2ря
овс1т
о3в2тр
ов2чим
о1г
ог2лі
ог2лоб
о3го
ог2р
о2гс
о1ґ
о1д
од2в
оде2к1л
одіа3
о2дл
одно1
од2р
о2дц
о2дь
о1е
ое2в
оек1
ое2л
ое2н
ое2п
о1є
о2єг
о2єк
о2єна
о2єно
о2єп
о2єр
о2єт
о2єч
о1жа
о1жв
о1же
о1жу
2оза
оза2й
оз2ва.
оз2ви.
оз1д2
озі3л2
озо1с
оз'1є
о1і2
оінс3
о1ї
ої2де
ої2до
ої1ль
ой2мо
ойс2
о1к
о2кб
ок2лі
о2клю
ок3ляк
о2км
о2кн
ок3рий
ок2рут
окст2
о2кт
о2кф
о2кц
о1л
оле1с2
о3ли
ол2ля
о2льк
о2льс
о3лю
о1м
оманд1а
ом1інт
о2мк
о4мни
ом2но
омо1ск
омо3т
ом2ру
она4г3н
она2з3
она2с1т
2онац
онг2р
оне2вр
2оно
он2трал
он2т2рат
о1о
оо2б
оо2в
о2ог
оо2д
оо2к
оок3р
о2ом
ооп3р
оо2с1
о2оте
оо2ц
оо2ч
о1п
опі2з3
оп2ли
оп2лі
о2плю
о2пля
о2пн
опок3л
опре1с
опри2й
опри2с
оп3рі
оп2си
оп2сі
оп3со
оп2су
о1ра
ор1алг
о2р1а2мі
о2ранг
ора1с2
ордо2с
орек1
орель1
оре1т2
ори2вч
орис1
оро2зн
ор2тв
орто1
о3ру
о1рь
о2с1во
оск1ля
о2скн
ос2кор
оск3р
о1сл
о3с2ло
ос2лу
ос2ль
ос2нет
ос2па
ос2пл
ос2пор
оспо2с3
ос2пр
оспри2й
ос1тає
ос1таю
о1с4т2в
ос2теб
о1стиг
ос1тн
ос2толи
ост2ру
о2сту.
ос2туля
ос2х
о1т
от2в
о2тви
о2тк
о2тл
от3ли
о2т3н
о3то
ото1з2
ото1с
отран3
от2ре
от2ро
о2тс
о3ту
о2тф
о2тц
о1у
оу2д
оу2к
оу2п3
оус1т
оут3
оу2ч
о1ф
о2фн
о2фри
о2фро
оф2то
о2х1ато
ох2в
ох1е2л
о2х1ос
о2хот
о2хоч
о1ц
о1ч
о2чт
о1ш
о2ш3в
ош3ка
о2ш3ки
о3ш2лі
о2шм
о2шн
ошт3р
о1щ
о1ю
о2юр
о1я
оя2в
оя2гі
оя2д
оя2з
оя2ру
1па
па2б
па2нот
па2пл
па2п3р
пас3л
пас1м
па2хв
п1д
1пе
пере1б2
пере1с
пе2роб
1пи
пис3к
пи2тв
пі2вар
пі2в1і
пі2в'
пі2дж
піді1
пі2доб
1пій
пі3кр
1пір
1піс
1піт
2п1к
п3ла.
2плез
п2лем
2плен
2плею
2плі.
1п2лід
плі1о
2пло.
2плос
п2лощ
п2ль
п1ля
п1м
п1н
2пна
2пні
2пно
2пня
1по
поа2
по1б2
пов2с
по3в2т
по3в2ч
пог2
по1з2
пої2т
3пой2
по1йм
пок2
по2кля
пок3с
по3л2л
по3мн
по3м2с
поп2
по2пс
по1с2к
поск1л
пос2л
по1см
пос2не
пос2ну
по1сп
посп3р
пос2тел
пос2том
пос2тор
пост1р
пот2
по1х2
пош2
п1п
1п2р
2пр.
2п3ра.
п3рал
2п3ран
пре1к2
пре1сто
при1
прив2
при3г2
при3д
приз2м
прип2
прис2т
2прі
пров2ч
про1з
п4роп
прос2п
прос1та
п1с
2пс.
2п3са
псе2
п3си.
2пст
2псь
2п1т
п2тв
1пу
пук3л
п3ф2
1п2х
2п1ц
2п1ч
2п1ш
1пю1
1пя
1п'
1ра.
1раб
3раба
3раби
ра2бл
ра2вм
2равн
равос2
1раг
2раге
ра2ген
ра2гл
ра2єв
ра2зд
ра2зн
1раї
1рал
2р1а2льт
3ралю.
р1ангі
2ранж
ран2са
ран2сц
1рао
2ра2пл
ра2пн
1рар
ра1сло
2ра2так
ра2тв
2раци
2раша
р3б
рб2ла
рб2р
р1в
р3вен
р3вл
2р3вн
1рвус
2р1г
р2гс
р1ґ
р1д
рде2ль
р3дн
р3дс3м
1ре
2реац
реви2т3
ре4вл
рево1
ревос2
ре3вт
ре1грі
ред1ост
ре1дру
ре2дус
ре2дуч
ре1зв
реї2
ре1йм
3рене
3реня
ре1об
ре1оз
ре1ої
ре1ол
ре3он
ре1оп
ре1пл
ре1р2
рерос1
ре2ск
рес2тол
ре1стр
ре3тв
ре2хл
ре1шк
р1ж
р2ж1ад
р3жк
р3жн
ржо1
р3жс
2р1з
1ри
риб2л
ри2дв
риз4на
риї2
3рин.
3рину
ри2пла
2ри2тв
рит2ри
ри3т2ч
1рі
3ріа
2ріб
3рібк
2рім
2ріну
3ріо
рі1ол
ріо1с
рі1от
3ріс
рі1т
2річі
2р1й
2р1к
2р1л
2р3м
рма1с
рмис1
рмо1с
2р1н
рна2с3
3рнс
1ро
3ро.
роа2
2ровн
ров2ча
ро3в2чу
ро2гв
рог2н
род2м
2роє.
ро2єю
роз1б2
роз1в
роз3д
3розр
ро1йди
ро2кв
рок2р
2р1орг
ророс1
ро1с2к
ро2сл
ро1сп
рос2тиг
ро1стр
ро2стра
роти1
рот2р
ро2хв
ро2шк
2роя
2р3п
рп1л
р1р
1ррс
2р1с
рс3к
рс1т
рс2тар
р2сть
2р1т
р2тл
р3тмо
р2т1об
рт2ро
р2тс2
р3ту
1ру
3рув
3руде
2руж
2руку
ру3льк
2руми
2румо
руна2
ру1нь
рус1т
2рутк
2рутц
2руя
р1ф
рф2л
2р3х
рх2ло
2р1ц
рци2с
р2ць
2р3ч
2р3ш
ршо1
ршос2
р1щ
1рю1
1ря
ря2пл
2ряс
1р'
1са
са2ге
сае2
само3в
2с1атл
са4тр
с1б
1св
с2ва
2све
с2ви
сво2єї
сво2єм
сво2єю
с3воюв
с1г
с1д
1с2е
себ2л
седо2
седоз1
се1з
сек3с
се3ле
се1оз
се1ос
се1с2л
сес1т
1си
си3г2л
си4гн
си2др
си2пл
си2тр
1с2і
сі2кл
с1к
2ск.
1скаф
ск1в
с2кид
1с2кип
1с2кл
ск2ле
с3кли
ск1лят
с2коп
ско1с2
2скот
ск3реб
с2крі
ск3ріб
с3кс
с1лак
с1лам
2с1лас
с2лиз
с2лів'
с2лід
2с3лл
1слу
2слю
с1ля
2слят
с2мер
с2мик
1смі
с1мін
с1н
с2наж
сна2с
1с2ніж
1со
сог2
со2пла
сос1т
со2тр
со2шк
3сою
с2пас
1спів
с1пл
сп2ле
1сплу
с1пн
с2пов
с2пож
с2пок
с2пол
с2по1с2
сп3ре
с1р
с1с
с2се.
с2сем
с2сет
с2сеш
с2су.
2ст.
1стаб
1стальт
1станц
1стас
1стах
1стб
с3тв
2ств.
с2тг
1стеб
с2тег
с2теж
с2тели
2стемб
с2теп
1с2тиро
2стич
с2тіж
2стії
1стій
с2тік
2стім
2стінф
2стія
с1тк
с1тл
с2той
сток1р
с2току
1с2толу
с2топн
1стоя
2стп
2стр.
с1тра.
с1тров
с1тру.
ст3руб
1струм
2стс
с3тт
1с2туд
с2тук
2стула
2стулю
1ступ
2стф
с1тц
1с2тяг
1су
су2бор
су1к2р
су2льс
1сфе
1сх2
с2хе
с2хи
с2хо
2с3хоч
с1ц
с2ць
2с1ш
с2ь
2сь.
1сьє
1сьй
1ськ
2ськ.
2ськв
1сьм
1сьс
1сья
1сю
1ся
2с'1
1та.
та2бл
1тавр
1таг
1тад
1таєв
1тазі
та2їл
1тай.
1так
2таки
1тал.
1тала
1тало
1талу
2таля
1тамі
1тани
1таннє
1танні
1танс
1таня
1тап
та2пн
таро1
тарос2
1тасе
1тасі
1тасс
1тась
1татит
1татт
1тать
1таф
1тац
2таці.
1тачан
1таш
1тая
2т1б
1т1в
4тв.
т3ва
2твей
т3ви
т3вл
т1г
2т1д
1те
те1г
те2гн
тег1р
2т1емб
2теме
те2міг
тео1
теоб2
те2сл
тес1т
те4ть
те2хо
1тє1
тєс4
т1ж
2т1з4
1ти
ти2бл
ти2гл
2тигт
тило1
ти2л1ор
2тильо
ти2льс
тип2л
2тирл
ти2с3м
ти2тру
ти2хл
тихо3
1ті
2тіб
2тійк
2тійл
2тілю
2т1імп
2тінф
ті1сл
т1к
т2кан
т2кац
т3ко
т1л
3т2лу
2т1м
3тми
т1н
1тнет
т2ни.
т3ні
т3но
т3ня
1то
то1б2р
тобс1
то2вс
то3в2т
то2вч
то2гн
тое2
2тоє
2тоїм
2тоїте
2тоїш
2толів
2тольн
2толя
то2пле
то2п3ли
то1ск
тос2л
2тосо
то1сп
то2фл
то3фт
то1х2
то2шл
2тою
2тоя
2т1п
4тр.
т3ра.
т1рак
1т2ранс
3трап
1т1рац
2трг
т1рд1
т3ре.
треп3р
т3ри.
т2рив
три3ф2
т2рищ
т3ріб.
трі3льц
2трн
т3роб
1троф
2троц
т2роче
2трп
2трр
т2руд
2трумо
т2рунн
1т1с
2тс2к
2тсо
т3сь
2т1т
т2тс
т3тя
1ту
2туп
т1ф
1тх
т2ха
т1хн
т1ц
2т1ч
2т1ш
т1щ
4ть.
1тьб
1тьє
3тьк
1тьм
1тьов
1тьом
1тьох
3тьс
2тьф
1тю
2тюд
1тя
2тямк
2тямн
2т'1
т'я2
у1а
уа1с
уб2г
уб1орд
уб1о2ре
уб1р
уб2рі
убт2
у1в
уві1б2
увіг2
уві1й2
уві3л2
увім2
уві1р2в
уві1т
у2вс
у2г1р
уг3ри.
уг3рів.
уд2в
у1д2з
у2дзь
удов3ч
удос2
у1е
уе1д
у1є
у1жа
у1же
у1жу
у1з
уз1в
у2зг
у2зд
у2зл
у2зн
у2зт
у1і
у1ї
ук2ли
ук2ло
уко1
укоз2
укос2
у1л
у2льк
у3льн
у2льт
уль2то2
у1м
у2мк
ум2р
ун2дл
ун3дш
уне2сл
у3о
уо2с
у1пі
упі2во
упі2з3
упос1
упри3
уприс2
у1ра
ур2ви
ур2ву
ури2вч
урос1
усе1с2
1у2сім
уск1л
уск3р
ус2лі
ус2м
ус1п
ус1тав.
ус2тиг
ус3туп.
у1т
у2т2в
ут3ві
ути2з
у2т3к
у4т3л
у2т3н
у2тр
ут3рен
у2тс
у2тц
у2ть1
у1у
у1фе
уф1р
у1ц
у1ч
у2чв
уч2ва
у2чл
уч1т
у1щ
у1ю
у1я
1фа
фа2б
ф1г
фе1о
фес1т
1фі
фі1о
2ф1к
ф1л
2ф1м
ф1н
1фо
фо1б2
фо3к
2фр.
ф1ран
ф1рат
фре2й
фри1
ф2риж
ф2риз
2фрі1
2фру
2ф1с
2ф1т
ф2ть
1фу
2ф1ц
2ф1ш
1ха
хав3ч
2х1ак
х1анг
ха2пл
ха2пн
ха2том
ха2тх
х1б
1хв
2хв.
х3ва.
х3ви.
2х3вя
х1г
х1д
1хе
хео3
1хи
хи2бл
хи2тр
1хі
хіє2
2х1к
х3ла
1хло
х1ля
х2ме
х1мі
х1н
хна2с
1хо
2х1об
хо2вр
хо2пл
3хор
хос2л
хос3то
хо3ф2
х1п
х1ра
х3рен
хри2пл
хро2пл
х2ру
х3ря
х1с
х1т
хтоз4
х2т2с
1ху
2х1ц
х1ч
х'1
х'я2
1ца
ц1віл
2ц1г
2ц1д
1це
це2г1л
це1з2
це1кл
це1кр
це1о
це1с
2ц1з
1ци
ци2к
цик1л
ци2пл
ци2тр
ци2фр
1ці
2ц1к
ц1л
2ц1м
2ц1н
1цо
2ц1р
ц1с
2ц1т
цу2ль
2ц1ц
2ць.
1цьк
1цьо
1цю
1ця
1ча
ча2бр
ча2дц
ча2з
ча2пл
ч1б
ч1в
2чви
1че
ч1ж
1чи
чи2з
чи2к3р
1чі
2ч1к
1ч2ле
2чли
ч1м
2ч1н
1чо
ч1р
2ч1с
2чт.
1чта
1чти
1чу
чу2п3
чх2
2ч1ц
2ч1ч
1чю
1ша
ша2бл
ша2пл
ша2фр
ша2шк
ш1б
1ш2в
2шв.
ш3ве
ш1г
1ше
ше2вр
1ши
ши2пл
ши2тв
ши2фр
1ші
шк2
2шка
1шкі
шкі3л
ш1к3л
ш1к3н
ш2кол
1шкр
ш2кур
ш1л
ш2леш
ш2ли.
ш2ль
1шлю
ш1м
1шма
ш2миг
ш3н
1шо
шо2у
ш1п2
ш1р
ш1с
ш1т
2шт.
2шті
шт2р
шт3ру
1шу
шус1та
2ш3ц
ш1ш
1ш'
ща2бл
ще1з2г
1щи
щи2г
щи2пл
2щ1н
що2г
що3д2
2щ1с
ь1б
ь1в
ь2во
ь1г
ье1
ь1з
ь1й
ь1к
ь2кв
ь1м
ьма1с
ьми1
ьмис2
ьмо1с
ь1н
ьоа2
ьо3д2
ьок2
ьома1
ьо2хе
ьо2хо
ь3п
ь1р
ь1с
ьс1т
ь1т
ь2т1ам
ьт1р
ь2тс
ь2тф
ь1ф
ьф1р
ь2ху
ь1ц
ь3ч
ь1ш
ьш2п
ь1щ
ю1а
юб1р
ю1в
ю1г
ю1є
ю1ж
ю1з
ю2зн
ю1ї
ю1к
ю2кн
ю1л
ю1м
2юн
ю1о
ю1пі
ю1ра
ю2ралю
ю3ркс
ю1с
ю2ск
ю2с1л
ю2сн
ю2сс
ю2с1т
юст1р
ю1т
ю2тн
ю2ть
ю1х
ю2хт
ю1ц
ю1ч
ю1щ
ю1ю
яб1р
я1ві
я1во
яв3ч
я2дер
я1є
я1жа
я1же
я1жу
я1ї
я2кіс
як1л
як1р
я3ку
я1л
я1мі
я1му
яно1
янос2
я1о2
я1п
я2пн
я2пс
я1ра
1ярду
яро3
яс1л
яс2ло
ясої2
яс1т
я1т
я2тв
яти1
ятис2
я2тк
я2тл
я2тн
я2тс
я2тц
я1у1
я1ц
я1щ
я1ю
я1я
'1єв
'є2му
'2і1
'ї2м
'ї2с
'2к
'ю2д
'2ют
'3яб
'1ясн
